Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1492.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 6, article 10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-795.04, to read: START_STATUTE36-795.04. Kratom products; storage; packaging; advertising A. A retailer shall keep all kratom products behind the sales counter. B. A processor or retailer may not: 1. Package or label any kratom product in a false or misleading manner. 2. Manufacture or sell any kratom product that resembles the form of a human, animal, insect, fruit, toy or cartoon. 3. Sell or advertise any kratom product with a name that resembles or imitates food or drink brands marketed to children, or otherwise advertise kratom products to children. END_STATUTE